South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   Section 7-15-310(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) "Members of the Armed Forces of the United States" means members of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Air Force, the United States Space Force, the United States Coast Guard, or any of their respective components. SECTION 2.   Section 7-15-610(1), (11), and (12) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) "Members of the Armed Forces of the United States" means members of the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Air Force, the United States Space Force, the United States Coast Guard, or any of their respective components. (11) "Uniformed service" means: (a) active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the United States; (b) the Merchant Marine, the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; or (c) the National Guard or organized militia. (12) "Uniformed-service voter" means an individual who is qualified to vote and is: (a) a member of the active or reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the United States who is on active duty; (b) a member of the Merchant Marine, the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; (c) a member on activated status of the National Guard or organized militia; or (d) a spouse or dependent of a member referred to in this item. SECTION 3.   Section 8-7-10(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) "Military service" means service in the Army, Navy, Coast Guard, Air Force, Space Force, or Marine Corps of the United States or any compulsory service in any capacity to the Federal Government for the purpose of national defense; and SECTION 4.   Section 63-5-910(A)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) In the case of a parent who is a member of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, or a Reserve component of these services, "military service or service" means a deployment for combat operations, a contingency operation, or a natural disaster based on orders that do not permit a family member to accompany the member on the deployment. SECTION 5.   This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----